Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9N-103] Fiduciary responsibilities. (a)
In addition to the requirements of section 431:9A-123.5, bail agents shall have
the responsibilities of a trustee for all premium, return premium funds, and
collateral or security received or collected under this article.

(b) All premiums received, less commissions if
authorized, shall be remitted to the insurer on or before the contractual due
date or, if there is no contractual due date, within forty-five days after
receipt.

(c) All returned premiums received from or
credited by insurers to the account of the bail agent shall be remitted to or
credited to the account of the person entitled thereto within thirty days after
the receipt or credit.

(d) An insurer having knowledge that a bail
agent has failed to account for any collected premium to the insurer more than
forty-five days after the contractual due date or, if there is no contractual
due date, more than ninety days after receipt, shall promptly report the
failure to the commissioner in writing.

(e) Every insurer shall remit unearned premium
funds to the person entitled thereto or shall otherwise credit the account of
the bail agent as soon as is practicable after entitlement to the premium funds
has been established, but in no event more than forty-five days after the
effective date of any cancellation or termination effected by the insurer or
after the date of entitlement thereto, as established by notification of
cancellation or of termination or as otherwise established. A bail agent having
knowledge of a failure on the part of any insurer to comply with this
subsection shall promptly report the failure to the commissioner in writing.

(f) No bail agent shall commingle premiums
belonging to insurers and return premiums received or held by the bail agent or
persons entitled to such funds with the bail agent's personal funds or with any
other funds except those directly connected with the bail agent's bail
business. [L 2008, c 134, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next